Utah statutes.
72-9-404.   Bills of lading -- Form.
Bills of lading issued by any motor carrier for the transportation of goods
within this state shall conform to this chapter, rules made under this
chapter, and Title 70A, Chapter 7a, Part 3, Bills of Lading -- Special
Provisions, that are not in conflict with this chapter.
